test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-aqbli_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - aʼbli: # Noun 200 'eng /est abiline/fin' - full paradigm
     aʼbli+N+Sg+Nom: [aʼbli, abli]
     aʼbli+N+Sg+Gen: [aʼbliz, abliz]
     aʼbli+N+Sg+Par: [aʼblizt, ablizt]
     aʼbli+N+Sg+Dat: [aʼblizõn, ablizõn]
     aʼbli+N+Sg+Ins: [aʼblizõks, ablizõks]
     aʼbli+N+Sg+Ill: [aʼblizõ, ablizõ]
     aʼbli+N+Sg+Ela: [aʼblizõst, ablizõst]
     aʼbli+N+Pl+Nom: [aʼblizt, ablizt]
     aʼbli+N+Pl+Gen: [aʼblizt, ablizt]
     aʼbli+N+Pl+Par: [aʼbliži, abliži]
     aʼbli+N+Pl+Dat: [aʼbliztõn, abliztõn]
     aʼbli+N+Pl+Ins: [aʼbliztõks, abliztõks]
     aʼbli+N+Pl+Ill: [aʼbližiz, abližiz]
     aʼbli+N+Pl+Ela: [aʼbližist, abližist]
